ro-RO: Tipul de suport al țesăturii pentru tapițerie: Cu suport adeziv (dezlipește și lipește); Cu suport de pâslă; Cu suport de spumă; Cu suport tricotat; Fără suport (necăptușit); Cu suport nețesut; Cu suport de cauciuc; Cu suport de plasă; Cu suport de tricot; Altele
it: Tipo di supporto del tessuto di rivestimento: Retro adesivo (pellicola rimovibile); Retro in feltro; Retro in schiuma; Retro a maglia; Senza retro; Retro in tessuto non tessuto; Retro in gomma; Retro in canovaccio; Retro in tricot; Altro
cs: Typ podkladu látky: S lepicí vrstvou (samolepicí); S plstěným podkladem; S pěnovým podkladem; S pleteným podkladem; Bez podkladu; S netkaným podkladem; S gumovým podkladem; S mřížkovým podkladem; S trikotovým podkladem; Ostatní
zh-TW: 內裝布料背襯類型: 黏合式背襯 (撕貼式); 氈絨背襯; 泡棉背襯; 針織背襯; 無背襯 (無底); 不織布背襯; 橡膠背襯; 網布背襯; 經編背襯; 其他
vi: Loại vải lót bọc nội thất: Có keo dán mặt sau (bóc và dán); Lót nỉ; Lót mút; Lót vải dệt kim; Không có mặt sau (không lót); Lót vải không dệt; Lót cao su; Lót vải màn; Lót vải tricot; Khác
zh-CN: 室内装潢面料背衬类型: 带背胶（即撕即贴）; 毛毡背衬; 泡沫背衬; 针织背衬; 无背衬（不带背胶）; 无纺布背衬; 橡胶背衬; 网格布背衬; 经编背衬; 其他
th: ประเภทวัสดุเสริมด้านหลังผ้าหุ้มเฟอร์นิเจอร์: ด้านหลังเคลือบกาว (ลอกแล้วแปะ); ด้านหลังบุผ้าสักหลาด; ด้านหลังบุโฟม; ด้านหลังบุผ้าถัก; ไม่มีวัสดุบุด้านหลัง; ด้านหลังบุผ้าไม่ทอ; ด้านหลังบุยาง; ด้านหลังบุผ้าตาข่ายสคริม; ด้านหลังบุผ้าทริคอต; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta hrbtne strani blazinjenja: Z lepljivo podlogo (odlepi in prilepi); Podloga iz filca; Podloga iz pene; Pletena podloga; Brez podloge; Netkana podloga; Gumirana podloga; Podloga iz mrežaste tkanine (scrim); Podloga iz trikota; Drugo
pl: Typ podkładu tkaniny obiciowej: Podkład samoprzylepny (odklej i przyklej); Podkład filcowy; Podkład piankowy; Podkład dzianinowy; Brak podkładu; Podkład z włókniny; Podkład gumowy; Podkład siatkowy; Podkład trykotowy; Inne
bg-BG: Тип основа (подложка) на тапицерския плат: Лепящ гръб (самозалепващ); Гръб от филц; Гръб от пяна; Плетен гръб; Без гръб (без подложка); Нетъкан гръб; Гумен гръб; Гръб с армировъчна мрежа; Трикотажен гръб; Друг
nb: Bakside av møbeltrekk: Selvklebende bakside (dra av og klistre på); Filtbakside; Skumbakside; Strikket bakside; Ingen bakside (uten bakside); Ikke-vevd bakside; Gummibakside; Scrim-bakside; Trikotbakside; Annet
fi: Verhoilukankaan taustan tyyppi: Liimataustainen (tarrakiinnitys); Huopataustainen; Vaahtomuovitaustainen; Neulostaustainen; Ei taustaa (taustamaton); Kuitukangastaustainen; Kumitaustainen; Tukikangastaustainen; Trikootaustainen; Muu
da: Bagsidetype for møbelstof: Selvklæbende bagside (træk af og klæb); Bagside i filt; Bagside i skum; Bagside i strik; Ingen bagside (uden bagside); Non-woven bagside; Bagside i gummi; Bagside i lærred; Bagside i tricot; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de revestimento do tecido de estofo: Verso adesivo (descolar e colar); Verso em feltro; Verso em espuma; Verso em malha; Sem verso; Verso em não tecido; Verso em borracha; Verso em tela; Verso em tricô; Outro
en: Upholstery fabric backing type: Adhesive backed (peel-and-stick); Felt backed; Foam backed; Knit backed; No backing (unbacked); Non-woven backed; Rubber backed; Scrim backed; Tricot backed; Other
de: Art der Rückseitenbeschichtung des Polsterstoffs: Selbstklebender Rücken; Filzrücken; Schaumstoffrücken; Strickrücken; Kein Rücken (ohne Rücken); Vliesrücken; Gummirücken; Gittergeweberücken; Trikotrücken; Andere
ja: 張地裏地タイプ: 粘着性裏地 (はがして貼るタイプ); フェルト裏地; フォーム裏地; ニット裏地; 裏地なし; 不織布裏地; ラバー裏地; スクリム裏地; トリコット裏地; その他
ko: 실내 장식용 원단 뒷면 처리 유형: 점착식 뒷면(필 앤 스틱); 펠트 뒷면; 폼 뒷면; 니트 뒷면; 뒷면 없음; 부직포 뒷면; 고무 뒷면; 스크림 뒷면; 트리코트 뒷면; 기타
tr: Döşemelik kumaş arka kaplama tipi: Yapışkan tabanlı (soy ve yapıştır); Keçe tabanlı; Köpük tabanlı; Örgü tabanlı; Taban yok (tabansız); Dokumasız tabanlı; Kauçuk tabanlı; File tabanlı; Triko tabanlı; Diğer
sv: Typ av baksidesmaterial för klädseltyg: Självhäftande baksida (dra av och fäst); Filtbaksida; Skumbaksida; Stickad baksida; Ingen baksida (utan baksida); Non-woven-baksida; Gummibaksida; Scrim-baksida; Trikåbaksida; Övrigt
el: Τύπος υποστρώματος υφάσματος ταπετσαρίας: Με αυτοκόλλητη πλάτη (αφαίρεση και επικόλληση); Με πλάτη από τσόχα; Με πλάτη από αφρώδες υλικό; Με πλεκτή πλάτη; Χωρίς πλάτη (χωρίς επένδυση); Με πλάτη από non-woven (μη υφασμένο); Με πλάτη από καουτσούκ; Με πλάτη από καμβά; Με πλάτη από tricot; Άλλο
lt-LT: Baldinio audinio pagrindo tipas: Su lipniu pagrindu (nulupamas ir priklijuojamas); Su veltinio pagrindu; Su porolono pagrindu; Su megztu pagrindu; Be pagrindo; Su neaustiniu pagrindu; Su guminiu pagrindu; Su tinklelio pagrindu; Su trikotažo pagrindu; Kita
sk-SK: Typ podkladovej látky na čalúnenie: Lepiaci podklad (odlepovací); Plstený podklad; Penový podklad; Pletený podklad; Bez podkladu (nepodšité); Netkaný podklad; Gumený podklad; Mriežkový podklad; Trikotový podklad; Iný
pt-BR: Tecido de estofamento tipo de base: Fundo adesivo (destacar e colar); Fundo de feltro; Fundo de espuma; Fundo de malha; Sem fundo (não forrado); Fundo de TNT; Fundo de borracha; Fundo de tela; Fundo de tricô; Outro
nl: Bekledingstof voeringtype: Met kleefrug (zelfklevend); Met viltrug; Met schuimrug; Met gebreide rug; Geen rug (zonder rug); Met non-woven rug; Met rubberen rug; Met scrim-rug; Met tricot-rug; Anders
ru: Тип основы обивочной ткани: Клеевая основа (самоклеящаяся); Войлочная основа; Поролоновая основа; Трикотажная основа; Без основы; Нетканая основа; Резиновая основа; Сетчатая основа; Основа из трико; Другое
hu: Kárpitszövet hátoldalának típusa: Ragasztós hátlapú (lehúzható és ragasztható); Filc hátlapú; Hab hátlapú; Kötött hátlapú; Hátlap nélküli; Nem szőtt hátlapú; Gumi hátlapú; Háló hátlapú; Trikó hátlapú; Egyéb
fr: Type d’envers du tissu d’ameublement: Envers adhésif (autocollant); Envers en feutre; Envers en mousse; Envers en maille; Sans envers (non doublé); Envers non tissé; Envers en caoutchouc; Envers en canevas; Envers en tricot; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta podloge od tkanine za presvlake: Ljepljiva podloga (odljepljivanje i lijepljenje); Podloga od filca; Podloga od pjene; Pletena podloga; Bez podloge; Netkana podloga; Gumena podloga; Podloga od mrežice; Triko podloga; Ostalo
es: Tipo de respaldo de tela de tapicería: Con reverso adhesivo (despegable); Con reverso de fieltro; Con reverso de espuma; Con reverso de punto; Sin reverso; Con reverso no tejido; Con reverso de goma; Con reverso de malla; Con reverso de tricot; Otro